Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 2. Hunting and Trapping.
§ 29.1-523.1.
Hunting deer with sights after dark; forfeiture of weapon and sighting device.

Any person who kills or attempts to kill any deer between one hour after sunset and one hour before sunrise using a firearm equipped with any sighting device other than iron or open sights shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition to this penalty, the court shall revoke the current hunting license and privileges of the person convicted of violating this section and prohibit that person from hunting for a period of one to five years. Notification of such revocation or prohibition shall be forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsections C and D of §

18.2-56.1

.

Every firearm equipped with any sighting device other than iron or open sights used with the knowledge or consent of the owner in violation of this section shall be forfeited to the Commonwealth. Upon being condemned as forfeited in proceedings under Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2, the proceeds of the sale shall be disposed of according to law.This section shall not apply to persons duly authorized to kill deer according to the provisions of §

29.1-529

.

History.

2001, c. 112; 2010, c. 183; 2012, cc. 283, 756.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183, in subsection A, substituted “license and privileges” for “license, if any” and “that person from hunting for a period of one to five years” for “the issuance of any hunting license to that person for the next license year.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.)” for “Chapter 22 (§

19.2-369

et seq.)” in subsection B.

§ 29.1-524.
Forfeiture of vehicles and weapons used for killing or attempt to kill.

Every vehicle, firearm, crossbow, slingbow, arrowgun, bow and arrow, or speargun used with the knowledge or consent of the owner or lienholder thereof, in killing or attempting to kill deer between a half hour after sunset and a half hour before sunrise in violation of §

29.1-523

, and every vehicle used in the transportation of the carcass, or any part thereof, of a deer so killed shall be forfeited to the Commonwealth. Upon being condemned as forfeited in proceedings under Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2, the proceeds of sale shall be disposed of according to law.

History.

1962, c. 520, § 29-144.3; 1978, c. 199; 1987, c. 488; 2002, c. 157; 2012, cc. 283, 756; 2017, c. 530; 2018, cc. 557, 558.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 157, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2003.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 157, effective January 1, 2003, substituted “firearm” for “rifle, shotgun, pistol” in the first sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.)” for “Chapter 22 (§

19.2-369

et seq.)” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 inserted “slingbow” in the first sentence of the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and inserted “arrowgun” in the first sentence.

§ 29.1-525.
Employment of lights under certain circumstances upon places used by deer.

Any person in any vehicle and then in possession of any firearm, crossbow, slingbow, arrowgun, bow and arrow, or speargun who employs a light attached to the vehicle or a spotlight or flashlight to cast a light beyond the water or surface of the roadway upon any place used by deer shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Every person in or on any such vehicle shall be deemed prima facie a principal in the second degree and subject to the same punishment as a principal in the first degree. This subsection shall not apply to a landowner in possession of a weapon when he is on his own land and is making a bona fide effort to protect his property from damage by deer and not for the purpose of killing deer unless the landowner is in possession of a permit to do so pursuant to the provisions of §

29.1-529

.

Any person in any motor vehicle who deliberately employs a light attached to such vehicle or a spotlight or flashlight to cast a light beyond the surface of the roadway upon any place used by deer, except upon his own land or upon land on which he has an easement or permission for such purpose, shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor. Every person in or on any such vehicle shall be deemed prima facie a principal in the second degree and subject to the same punishment as a principal in the first degree.

The provisions of subsections A and B shall not apply to activities conducted by a locality pursuant to a permit or written authorization issued by the Department.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in subsection A, the court shall revoke the current hunting license and privileges of the person convicted of a violation of subsection A and prohibit the person from hunting for a period of one to five years. In addition to the penalties prescribed in subsection B, the court may revoke the current hunting license and privileges of the person convicted of a violation of subsection B and prohibit that person from hunting for one to five years. If a person convicted of a violation of subsection A or B is found hunting during the prohibited period, the person shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Notification of such revocation or prohibition shall be forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsections C and D of §

18.2-56.1

.

History.

1962, c. 520, § 29-144.4; 1973, c. 369; 1974, c. 101; 1980, cc. 602, 607, § 29-144.4:1; 1981, c. 60; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 450; 1994, c. 113; 2002, c. 157; 2010, c. 183; 2014, c. 126; 2017, c. 530; 2018, cc. 557, 558.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 and Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 157, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2003.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 157, effective January 1, 2003, substituted “firearm” for “rifle, shotgun, pistol” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183, in subsection C, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” and “subsection B” throughout, substituted “license and privileges” for “license, if any” twice, substituted “person from hunting for a period of one to five years” for “issuance of any hunting license to that person for the next license year” and “that person from hunting for one to five years” for “the issuance of any hunting license to that person for the next license year.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 126, added subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 inserted “slingbow” in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and inserted “arrowgun” in the first sentence of subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Game and Game Laws, § 2.

§ 29.1-525.1.
Deer enclosures prohibited; exceptions; penalty.

It is unlawful to erect a fence that prevents or impedes the free egress of deer from the enclosed area with the intent to confine deer.

It is unlawful to hunt deer inside a fenced area that prevents or impedes the free egress of deer.

The provisions of subsection A shall not apply to:

Local, state or federal public lands on which fences are erected to protect public health or safety;

Enclosures permitted by the Department as fallow deer farms or permitted exhibitors holding native deer for educational purposes;

Enclosures permitted by the U.S. Department of Agriculture as exhibitors, breeders, or dealers; or

Zoos accredited by the American Zoological Association.

The provisions of subsection B shall not apply to (i) local, state or federal public lands on which fences are erected to protect public health or safety, or (ii) any person hunting in an enclosure or facility that (a) was constructed prior to July 1, 2001, (b) has been registered with the Department not later than August 1, 2001, and annually thereafter, and (c) has been modified not later than 90 days following registration in a manner approved by the Director or his designee to allow the free egress of deer. Such registration shall not be transferable. The Department shall place information of the initial registration requirement in newspapers of general circulation throughout the Commonwealth. Such enclosures or facilities shall operate using acceptable hunting and wildlife management practices determined by the Director or his designee, including, but not limited to, methods of take, use of dogs, and supplemental feeding. The Director or his designee shall provide the owner of the enclosure or facility with information on what constitutes acceptable hunting and wildlife management practices.

Any registered enclosure or facility within which the owners or persons hunting have not followed acceptable hunting wildlife management practices shall have its registration revoked by the Department. Upon revocation of the registration, any person hunting within the enclosure or facility shall be subject to the provisions of subsection B and the penalties imposed under subsection F.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person who is convicted of violating this section shall have his hunting license and privileges suspended by the court for a period of one to five years. In addition, the court may order compensation for replacement for any deer killed be paid to the Department as provided for in §

29.1-551

, and may order the owner of the fence to modify the fence to allow the free egress by deer.

History.

2001, c. 856; 2010, c. 183.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanor, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183, in subsection D, substituted “90 days” for “ninety days”; and in subsection F, inserted “license and” and substituted “one to five years” for “not less that three or more than five years.”

§ 29.1-525.2.
Fox and coyote enclosures prohibited; penalty.

It is unlawful to erect, maintain, or operate an enclosure for the purpose of pursuing, hunting, or killing or attempting to pursue, hunt, or kill any fox or coyote with a dog. For purposes of this section, “enclosure” means a fence or other barrier that is used to prevent or impede the natural egress by any fox or coyote. A person who violates any provision of this subsection is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. This subsection shall not be construed to limit the authority of the Department to enforce other available penalties.

This section shall not preclude the pursuing, hunting, or killing of any fox or coyote by a dog in the absence of an enclosure, or the killing of any fox or coyote by a landowner or tenant when the fox or coyote is damaging domestic stock or fowl on the owned or leased land.

Until July 1, 2054, the provisions of subsection A shall not apply to any location at which, as of January 1, 2014, a foxhound training preserve existed and was operating under a permit issued by the Department. The Department shall continue to issue or renew permits to existing locations in accordance with this section notwithstanding changes in the identity of the person or entity holding the permit.

The regulations governing foxhound training preserves in effect as of January 1, 2014, shall continue in full force and effect, provided, however, that the Department shall adopt regulations by October 1, 2014, to limit the total number of foxes stocked annually in all permitted preserves to 900. The Department shall specify a proportional number of foxes that may be stocked in each permitted preserve based upon the number of acres of the preserve as a percentage of the total acreage of permitted foxhound training preserves. If a preserve ceases to operate, its allocation of foxes from the previous year shall be deducted from the total number of foxes that may be stocked in foxhound training preserves in the Commonwealth.

The Department shall not deny a permit to an existing location solely due to recordkeeping failures or other technical violations of the regulations governing foxhound training preserves.

The Department shall deny a permit to an existing location if the location voluntarily ceases operation of its foxhound training preserve for a period of 12 consecutive months or longer.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-4002

, the denial of a permit to operate a foxhound training preserve by the Department shall constitute a case decision subject to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). If a permittee or owner of a location subject to a permit files a notice of appeal with the Department, the Department shall continue to permit the location until any such appeals have been exhausted and the Department’s determination upheld.

History.

2014, c. 605.

§ 29.1-526.
Counties and cities may prohibit hunting or trapping near primary and secondary highways.

The governing body of any county or city may prohibit by ordinance the hunting, with a firearm, of any game bird or game animal while the hunting is on or within 100 yards of any primary or secondary highway in such county or city and may provide that any violation of the ordinance shall be a Class 3 misdemeanor. In addition, the governing body of any county or city may prohibit by ordinance the trapping of any game animal or furbearer within fifty feet of the shoulder of any primary or secondary highway in the county or city and may provide that any violation of the ordinance shall be a Class 3 misdemeanor. No such ordinance shall prohibit such trapping where the written permission of the landowner is obtained. It shall be the duty of the governing body enacting an ordinance under the provisions of this section to notify the Director by registered mail no later than May 1 of the year in which the ordinance is to take effect. If the governing body fails to make such notice, the ordinance shall be unenforceable.

For the purpose of this section, the terms “hunt” and “trap” shall not include the necessary crossing of highways for the bona fide purpose of going into or leaving a lawful hunting or trapping area.

History.

1962, c. 141, § 29-144.5; 1964, c. 549; 1977, c. 377; 1982, c. 194; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421.

Cross references.

As to authority of any municipal corporation to prohibit all hunting within one-half mile of heavily populated areas, see §

15.2-1113.1

.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-527.
Counties, cities or towns may prohibit hunting near public schools and county, city, town or regional parks.

The governing body of any county, city or town may prohibit by ordinance, shooting or hunting with a firearm, or prohibit hunters from traversing an area while in possession of a loaded firearm, within 100 yards of any property line of a public school or a county, city, town or regional park. The governing body may, in such ordinance, provide that any violation thereof shall be a Class 4 misdemeanor. Nothing in this section shall give any county, city or town the authority to enforce such an ordinance on lands within a national or state park or forest, or wildlife management area.

History.

1985, c. 485, § 29-144.5:1; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to authority of any municipal corporation to prohibit all hunting within one-half mile of heavily populated areas, see §

15.2-1113.1

.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-527.1.
Localities may prohibit feeding of migratory and nonmigratory waterfowl.

Upon notice to the Department, any locality may prohibit by ordinance the feeding of migratory and nonmigratory waterfowl in any subdivision or other area of such locality which, in the opinion of the governing body, is so heavily populated as to make the feeding of such waterfowl a threat to public health or the environment. The terms “migratory” and “nonmigratory” waterfowl shall include those waterfowl defined as such in a listing as provided by the Department. The Department shall make available to localities a model ordinance suggested for use by localities. The locality shall post the appropriate signage that designates an area where the ordinance is applicable and shall be solely responsible for enforcement of the ordinance. The penalty for violating such an ordinance shall be a civil fine not to exceed $50.

A locality shall not enact such an ordinance on lands within a national or state park or forest, or wildlife management area.

History.

2004, c. 386.

§ 29.1-527.2.
Localities may prohibit feeding of deer.

Any city or town may, by ordinance, prohibit the feeding of deer within its jurisdiction. The Department shall make available to localities a model ordinance suggested for use by localities. The penalty for violating such an ordinance shall be a civil fine not to exceed $50. It shall be the duty of the governing body enacting an ordinance under this section to notify the Director by registered mail of the adoption of such an ordinance.

Any such ordinance shall not apply to agricultural, commercial, noncommercial, or residential plantings; distribution of food to livestock; or wildlife management activities conducted or authorized by the Department. The ordinance shall not limit the authority of the Board to regulate feeding of wildlife consistent with this chapter.

History.

2016, c. 376.

§ 29.1-528.
Board to develop model ordinances for hunting with firearms; counties or cities may adopt.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing model ordinances for hunting with firearms that may be adopted by counties or cities. Such model ordinances shall address items including firearm caliber; type of firearm, including rifle, shotgun, or muzzleloader; type of ammunition; and the hunting of groundhogs or coyotes.

The governing body of any county or city may, by ordinance, (i) prohibit hunting in such county or city with a shotgun loaded with slugs, or with a rifle of a caliber larger than .22 rimfire; (ii) permit the hunting of groundhogs with a rifle of a caliber larger than .22 rimfire between March 1 and August 31; (iii) permit the use of muzzle-loading rifles during the prescribed open seasons for the hunting of game species; (iv) specify permissible types of ammunition to be used for hunting in the county or city; or (v) permit the hunting of coyotes with a rifle of a caliber larger than .22 rimfire.

No such ordinance shall be enforceable unless the governing body notifies the Director by registered mail prior to May 1 of the year in which the ordinance is to take effect.

In adopting an ordinance pursuant to the provisions of this section, the governing body of any county or city may provide that any person who violates the provisions of the ordinance is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1976, c. 443, § 29-144.6; 1977, cc. 20, 377; 1978, c. 303; 1986, c. 342; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421; 2007, c. 642; 2016, c. 64.

Cross references.

As to authority of any municipal corporation to prohibit all hunting within one-half mile of heavily populated areas, see §

15.2-1113.1

.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 830, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries shall study issues related to the application of inconsistent local firearm ordinances in situations where a single parcel of property or two or more contiguous parcels under the same ownership are located in more than one locality and shall report its findings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources by the first day of the 2020 Regular Session.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 642 added the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 64 inserted the subsection B designation and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection A, substituted “adopt” for “promulgate” in the first sentence and rewrote the second sentence, which read “Such model ordinances developed by the Board shall address such items as, but are not limited to, firearm caliber, type of firearm (e.g. rifle, shotgun, muzzleloader), and type of ammunition”; in subsection B, inserted the clause (i) designation, substituted “(ii)” for “However such ordinance may,” “(iii)” for “Such ordinance may also,” “(iv)” for “Any such ordinance may also,” and added clause (v); in subsection D, substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty.”

§ 29.1-528.1.
Board to develop model ordinances for hunting with bow and arrow; counties or cities may adopt.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing model ordinances for hunting deer with bow and arrow, slingbows, and crossbows in those counties and cities where there is an overabundance of the deer population, which is creating conflicts between humans and deer, including safety hazards to motorists. The model ordinances shall include (i) the times at which such hunting shall commence and end each day and (ii) the number of deer that can be taken based on analysis performed by the Department.

No such ordinance shall be enforceable unless the governing body notifies the Director by registered mail prior to May 1 of the year in which the ordinance is to take effect. Any change jurisdictions may seek in the model ordinance shall be approved by the Board prior to its adoption.

In adopting an ordinance pursuant to the provisions of this section, the governing body of any locality may provide that any person who violates the provisions of the ordinance shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

2010, c. 512; 2017, c. 530.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 inserted “slingbows” in subsection A.

§ 29.1-528.2.
Local tree stand ordinance; disabled hunter exempt.

While hunting during any established open hunting season and in accordance with other laws and regulations, a hunter shall be exempt from any local ordinance requiring hunting from an elevated platform or tree stand if he (i) possesses a valid hunting license and is permanently disabled, as defined in §

58.1-3217

and as attested to by a licensed physician on a form provided by the Department and carried on the hunter’s person while hunting, or (ii) holds a lifetime disabled or disabled veterans license under §

29.1-302

,

29.1-302.02

, or

29.1-302

.03 or subsection C of §

29.1-302.1

.

The exemption provided by this section shall apply only to a hunter whose permanent disability, as attested to by a licensed physician pursuant to the provisions of this section or as accepted by the Director pursuant to the provisions of subsection C of §

29.1-302.1

, is based on a physical impairment or deformity.

History.

2018, c. 836.

§ 29.1-529.
Killing of deer, elk or bear damaging fruit trees, crops, livestock, or personal property; wildlife creating a hazard to aircraft or motor vehicles.

Whenever deer, elk or bear are damaging fruit trees, crops, livestock or personal property utilized for commercial agricultural production in the Commonwealth, the owner or lessee of the lands on which such damage is done shall immediately report the damage to the Director or his designee for investigation. If after investigation the Director or his designee finds that deer or bear are responsible for the damage, he shall authorize in writing the owner, lessee or any other person designated by the Director or his designee to kill such deer or bear when they are found upon the land upon which the damages occurred. However, the Director or his designee shall have the option of authorizing nonlethal control measures rather than authorizing the killing of elk or bear, provided that such measures occur within a reasonable period of time; and whenever deer cause damage on parcels of land of five acres or less, except when such acreage is used for commercial agricultural production, the Director or his designee shall have discretion as to whether to issue a written authorization to kill the deer. The Director or his designee may limit such authorization by specifying in writing the number of animals to be killed and duration for which the authorization is effective and may in proximity to residential areas and under other appropriate circumstances limit or prohibit the authorization between 11:00 p.m. and one-half hour before sunrise of the following day. The Director or his designees issuing these authorizations shall specify in writing that only antlerless deer shall be killed, unless the Director or his designee determines that there is clear and convincing evidence that the damage was done by deer with antlers. Any owner or lessee of land who has been issued a written authorization shall not be issued an authorization in subsequent years unless he can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Director or his designee that during the period following the prior authorization, the owner or his designee has hunted bear or deer on the land for which he received a previous authorization.

Subject to the provisions of subsection A, the Director or his designee may issue a written authorization to kill deer causing damage to residential plants, whether ornamental, noncommercial agricultural, or other types of residential plants. The Director may charge a fee not to exceed actual costs. The holder of this written authorization shall be subject to local ordinances, including those regulating the discharge of firearms.

Whenever wildlife is creating a hazard to the operation of any aircraft or to the facilities connected with the operation of aircraft, the person or persons responsible for the safe operation of the aircraft or facilities shall report such fact to the Director or his designee for investigation. If after investigation the Director or his designee finds that wildlife is creating a hazard, he shall authorize such person or persons or their representatives to kill wildlife when the wildlife is found to be creating such a hazard. As used in this subsection, the term “wildlife” shall not include any federally protected species.

Whenever deer are creating a hazard to the operation of motor vehicle traffic within the corporate limits of any city or town, the operator of a motor vehicle or chief law-enforcement officer of the city or town may report such fact to the Director or his designee for investigation. If after investigation the Director or his designee finds that deer are creating a hazard within such city or town, he may authorize responsible persons, or their representatives, to kill the deer when they are found to be creating such a hazard.

Whenever deer are damaging property in a locality in which deer herd population reduction has been recommended in the current Deer Management Plan adopted by the Board, the owner or lessee of the lands on which such damage is being done may report such damage to the Director or his designee for investigation. If after investigation the Director or his designee finds that deer are responsible for the damage, he may authorize in writing the owner, lessee or any other person designated by the Director or his designee to kill such deer when they are found upon the land upon which the damages occurred. The Director or his designee also may limit such authorization by specifying in writing the number of animals to be killed and the period of time for which the authorization is effective. The requirement in subsection A of this section, that an owner or lessee of land demonstrate that during the period following the prior authorization deer or bear have been hunted on his land, shall not apply to any locality that conducts a deer population control program authorized by the Department.

The Director or his designee may revoke or refuse to reissue any authorization granted under this section when it has been shown by a preponderance of the evidence that an abuse of the authorization has occurred. Such evidence may include a complaint filed by any person with the Department alleging that an abuse of the written authorization has occurred. Any person aggrieved by the issuance, denial or revocation of a written authorization can appeal the decision to the Department. Any person convicted of violating any provision of the hunting and trapping laws and regulations shall be entitled to receive written authorization to kill deer or bear. However, such person shall not (i) be designated as a shooter nor (ii) carry out the authorized activity for a person who has received such written authorization for a period of at least two years and up to five years following his most recent conviction for violating any provision of the hunting and trapping laws and regulations. In determining the appropriate length of this restriction, the Director shall take into account the nature and severity of the most recent violation and of any past violations of the hunting and trapping laws and regulations by the applicant. No person shall be designated as a shooter under this section during a period when such person’s hunting license or privileges to hunt have been suspended or revoked.

The Director or his designee may authorize, subject to the provisions of this section, the killing of deer over bait within the political boundaries of any city or town, or any county with a special late antlerless season, in the Commonwealth when requested by a certified letter from the governing body of such locality.

The parts of any deer or bear killed pursuant to this section or wildlife killed pursuant to subsection C shall not be used for the purposes of taxidermy, mounts, or any public display unless authorized by the Director or his designee. However, the meat of any such animal may be used for human consumption. The carcass and any unused meat of any such animal shall be disposed of within 24 hours of being killed. Any person who violates any provision of this subsection is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

It is unlawful to willfully and intentionally impede any person who is engaged in the lawful killing of a bear or deer pursuant to written authorization issued under this section. Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-145.1; 1954, c. 686; 1956, c. 684; 1958, cc. 315, 609; 1960, c. 129; 1962, c. 229; 1970, c. 79; 1980, c. 271; 1987, cc. 48, 488; 1991, c. 99; 1993, cc. 204, 273; 1994, c. 571; 1996, c. 314; 1998, c. 179; 1999, c. 563; 2000, c. 6; 2002, c. 174; 2003, cc. 123, 135; 2004, c. 447; 2008, cc. 17, 260; 2009, cc. 8, 305; 2010, c. 5; 2012, c. 247; 2013, c. 346; 2020, c. 958.

Cross references.

For an exception providing for the killing of deer pursuant to this section in municipalities where the discharge of firearms has been regulated or prohibited, see §

15.2-1113

.

For an exception providing for the killing of deer pursuant to this section in counties where the shooting of firearms or air-operated or gas-operated weapons has been prohibited, see §

15.2-1209

.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1987, c. 48, which amended former § 29-145.1, the comparable provision in former Title 29.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 6 added the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 174, in subsection A, in the fourth sentence, substituted “duration” for “the period of time” and added “and may in proximity to residential areas and under other appropriate circumstances limit or prohibit the authorization between 11:00 p.m. and one-half hour before sunrise of the following day” at the end thereof.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 123 substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in subsection A; inserted subsection B; and redesignated former subsections B to E as present subsections C to F.

The 2003 amendment by c. 135 substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A; and in present subsection F, divided the former fourth sentence into the present fourth and fifth sentences, in the present fourth sentence, substituted “the hunting and trapping laws and regulations shall be entitled to” for “this title shall” and deleted “but” at the end of that sentence, inserted “However, such person” at the beginning of the present fifth sentence, added “for a period of at least two years and up to five years following his most recent conviction for violating any provision of the hunting and trapping laws and regulations” at the end of the present fifth sentence, and added the sixth and seventh sentences.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 447 added subsection G.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 17 inserted “or any county with a special late antlerless season” in subsection G.

The 2008 amendment by c. 260 substituted “non-lethal control measures” for “the capture and relocation of such bear” and “such measures occur” for “the relocation occurs” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 8 added subsection H.

The 2009 amendment by c. 305, in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “wildlife is” for “deer are,” in the second sentence, substituted “wildlife is” for “deer are,” “wildlife” for “the deer,” respectively, and substituted “the wildlife is” for “they are” and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 5 deleted the former seventh sentence of subsection A, which read: “Deer or bear killed pursuant to such authorization shall be utilized or disposed of within 24 hours of being killed”; deleted the former third and fourth sentences of subsection D, which read: “The carcass of every deer or bear so killed may be awarded to the owner or lessee by the Director or his designee, who shall give such person a certificate to that effect on forms furnished by the Department. Any person awarded a deer or bear under this section may use the carcass as if he had killed the animal during the hunting season for deer or bear.”; deleted the former fourth and fifth sentences of subsection E, which read: “The carcass of every deer so killed may be awarded to the owner or lessee by the Director or his designee, who shall give such person a certificate to that effect on forms furnished by the Department. Any person awarded a deer under this section may use the carcass as if he had killed the animal during the hunting season for deer.”; redesignated former subsection H as subsection I; and added subsection H.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 247, in subsection A, inserted “elk” following “deer” near the beginning of the first sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “nonlethal control measures” for “non-lethal control measures” and “the killing of elk or bear” for “the killing of the bear.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 346, in subsection D, inserted the first and last occurrence of “or town” and “or chief law-enforcement officer of the city or town” near the middle.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection F at the end of the third sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

No prohibition on use of dogs when hunting bears. —

The Executive Director of Virginia Department of Game and Inland Fisheries or his designee, once he has issued a “kill permit” pursuant to §

29.1-529

for the taking of a bear, may not restrict that authorization so as to prohibit the use of dogs in hunting the bear. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Robert B. Beasley, Jr., Commonwealth’s Attorney, County of Powhatan, 12-101, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 25 (4/12/13).

§ 29.1-530.
Open and closed season for trapping, bag limits, etc.

There shall be a continuous open season for trapping nuisance species and a continuous closed trapping season on all other species of wild birds and wild animals, except as provided by Board regulations. However, a landowner or his agent may trap and dispose of, except by sale, squirrels creating a nuisance on his property at any time in any area where the use of firearms for such purpose is prohibited by law or local ordinance.

In addition, the following general rules shall be applicable to any person trapping in the Commonwealth:

The trapper shall be responsible for all damage done by an illegally set trap, and any person finding a trap set contrary to law may report it to the landowner upon whose land the trap is located or to any conservation police officer who may destroy or otherwise make the trap inoperable.

Licensed trappers may shoot wild animals caught in traps on any day of the week during the seasons prescribed in subsection A in order to dispatch such animal. No additional licenses are required other than a valid Virginia trapping license.

It is lawful to trap wild animals within the daily bag and season limits, if any, during the open season provided by Board regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-146; 1958, c. 495; 1974, c. 302; 1982, c. 335; 1987, c. 488; 2006, c. 20; 2007, c. 87; 2013, c. 349.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 221, cl. 1 provides: “[t]hat there shall be a closed season for trapping of fur-bearing animals within 300 yards of First Landing/Seashore State Park and the Virginia Marine Science Museum in the City of Virginia Beach. This closure will not prohibit trapping for scientific research, health or public safety purposes by employees or agents of the Commonwealth or the City of Virginia Beach nor prohibit private landowners or their designated agent from trapping nuisance animals.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 20, in subdivision B 3, substituted “on any day of the week during the seasons prescribed in subsection A in order to dispatch such animal” for “during the open hunting season if the trapper has a license to hunt” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in subdivision B 1.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 349 deleted former subdivision B 2 which read: “A landowner may trap furbearing animals, except beaver, muskrat and raccoons, upon his own land during closed season” and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “It is” for “It shall be” at the beginning of subdivision 3.